Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1238
Overdose; emergency medical service; report; department; report; prohibited acts.

(1) An emergency medical service that treats and releases, or transports to a medical facility, an individual experiencing a suspected overdose or an actual overdose shall report the incident to the department. A report of an overdose made under this section shall include the information required by the department for occurrences requiring a response to perceived individual need for medical care.

(2) An emergency medical service that reports an overdose under this section shall make best efforts to submit the report within seventy-two hours after responding to the incident.

(3) When the department receives a report pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, it shall report such information using the Washington/Baltimore High Intensity Drug Trafficking Area Overdose Mapping and Application Program or other similar secure access information technology platform.

(4) Overdose information reported pursuant to subsection (1) or (3) of this section shall not be (a) used for a criminal investigation or prosecution or (b) obtained by a law enforcement officer as part of a criminal investigation or prosecution.

Laws 2024, LB1355, § 3.